Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. Organization; Bonds; Consolidation

§ 37-9-101.
Mortgages; issue of corporate bonds; provisions as to bonds.

Every railroad company organized under the general incorporation laws of this state shall have power and is hereby authorized to mortgage or execute deeds of trust, in whole or in part, of the real and personal property and franchises, including its lands or other property granted to said company by the United States, or any state or territory, to secure money borrowed by them for the construction and equipment of their roads, and may also issue their corporate bonds in sums not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00); to make all of said mortgages or deeds of trust payable to bearer or otherwise, negotiable by delivery, bearing interest at rates not to exceed ten percent (10%) per annum, convertible into stock or not, at the option of the holder, and may sell the same at such rates and prices as they may deem proper, and if said bonds shall be sold below their nominal or par value, they shall be valid and binding upon the company, and no plea of usury shall be put in or allowed by said company in any suit or proceeding upon the same. The principal and interest of said bonds or either of them may be made payable within or without this state, at such place as may be determined upon by said company.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 61, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 549; R.S. 1899, § 3201; C.S. 1910, § 4194; C.S. 1920, § 5365; R.S. 1931, § 96-101; C.S. 1945, § 65-101; W.S. 1957, § 37-196.

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-9-102.
Consolidation; mode of effecting.

Whenever a line of railroad or any railroad company in this state, or any portion of said line, has been constructed so as to connect with any two (2) or more of such roads, said companies are hereby authorized to consolidate themselves into a single corporation in the manner following: the trustees of the said two (2) or more corporations may enter into an agreement under the corporate seal of each, for the consolidation of said two (2) or more corporations, prescribing the terms or conditions thereof; the mode of carrying the same into effect; the name of the new corporation; the number of the trustees thereof, which shall not be less than seven (7); the time and place of holding the first election of trustees; the number of shares of stock in the new corporation; the amount of each share; the manner of converting the shares of capital stock in each of said two (2) or more corporations, into shares in such new corporation; the manner of compensating stockholders in each of said two (2) or more corporations who refuse to convert their stock into the stock of such new corporation, with such other details as they shall deem necessary to perfect such consolidation of said corporations; and such new corporation shall possess all the powers, rights and franchises conferred upon such said two (2) or more corporations, and shall be subject to all the restrictions, and perform all the duties imposed by the provisions of the corporation laws of this state; provided, that all stockholders in either of such corporations who shall refuse to convert their stock into the stock of such new corporation, shall be paid an appraised value of said stock at the date of such consolidation.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 61, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 550; R.S. 1899, § 3202; C.S. 1910, § 4195; C.S. 1920, § 5366; R.S. 1931, § 96-102; C.S. 1945, § 65-102; W.S. 1957, § 37-197.

Cross references. —

As to consolidating with railroads in other states, see §

37-9-106

.

§ 37-9-103.
Consolidation; when consummated.

Upon making the agreement mentioned in the preceding section [§

37-9-102

], in the manner required therein, and filing a duplicate or counterpart thereof in the office of the secretary of state, the said two (2) or more corporations (mentioned or referred to in the last two (2) or more preceding sections [§§

37-9-101

and

37-9-102

], or any other law of the state) shall be merged in the new corporation provided for in such agreement, to be known by the corporate name therein mentioned; and the details of such agreement shall be carried into effect as provided therein.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 61, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 551; R.S. 1899, § 3203; C.S. 1910, § 4196; C.S. 1920, § 5367; R.S. 1931, § 96-103; C.S. 1945, § 65-103; W.S. 1957, § 37-198.

§ 37-9-104.
Consolidation; effects; rights of creditors.

Upon the election of the first board of trustees of the corporation created by the agreement pursuant to W.S.

37-9-102

, and by the provisions of W.S.

37-9-101

through

37-9-105

, all and singular the rights and franchises of each and all of the two (2) or more corporations, parties to such agreement, and all and singular the rights and interest in and to every species of property, real, personal and mixed, and things in action shall be deemed to be transferred to and vested in the new corporation, without any other deed or transfer, and the new corporation shall hold and enjoy the same, together with right-of-way and all other rights of property in the same manner and to the same extent as if the two (2) or more corporations, parties to the agreement, should have continued to retain the title and transact the business of the corporations. And the title and the real estate acquired by either of the two (2) or more corporations shall not be deemed to revert or be impaired by means of anything in W.S.

37-9-101

through

37-9-105

; provided, that all rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of either of the corporations shall be and hereby are preserved unimpaired; and the respective corporations shall continue to exist as far as may be necessary to enforce the same; provided, further, that all debts, liabilities and duties of either company shall henceforth attach to the new corporation, and be enforced to the same extent and in the same manner as if the debts, liabilities and duties had been originally incurred by it.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 61, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 552; R.S. 1899, § 3204; C.S. 1910, § 4197; C.S. 1920, § 5368; R.S. 1931, § 96-104; C.S. 1945, § 65-104; W.S. 1957, § 37-199; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “pursuant to W.S.

37-9-102

” for “in the preceding section mentioned,” “W.S.

37-9-101

through

37-9-105

” for “this subdivision,” or “this subdivision contained”; and made stylistic changes throughout.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-9-105.
Company may subscribe to capital stock of other railroad company.

Any railroad company incorporated under the general laws of this state may at any time by means of subscription to the capital stock of any other company or otherwise, aid such company in the construction of its road for the purpose of forming a connection with the line of road owned by such other company.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 61, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 553; R.S. 1899, § 3205; C.S. 1910, § 4193; C.S. 1920, § 5369; R.S. 1931, § 96-105; C.S. 1945, § 65-105; W.S. 1957, § 37-200.

§ 37-9-106.
Aid to other companies; extension outside of state; sale or lease to other railroads permitted; foreign railroads; taxation.

Any railroad company now or hereafter incorporated pursuant to the laws of this state, or of the United States, or of any state or territory of the United States, may at any time, by means of subscription to the capital stock of any other railroad company, or by the purchase of its stock or bonds, or by guaranteeing its bonds, or otherwise, aid such company in the construction of its railroad within and without this state; and any company owning or operating a railroad within this state may extend the same into any other state or territory, and may build, buy, lease, or may consolidate with any railroad or railroads in such other state or territory, or with any other railroad in this state and may operate the same, and may own such real estate and other property in such other state or territory as may be necessary or convenient in the operation of such road; or any railroad company may sell or lease the whole or any part of its railroad or branches within this state, constructed or to be constructed, together with all property and rights, privileges and franchises pertaining thereto, to any railroad company organized or existing pursuant to the laws of the United States or of this state or of any other state or territory of the United States; or any railroad company incorporated or existing under the laws of the United States, or of any state or territory of the United States, may extend, construct, maintain and operate its railroad, or any portion or branch thereof, into and through this state, and may build branches from any point on such extension to any place or places within this state; and the railroad company of any other state or territory, or of the United States, which shall so purchase or lease a railroad or any part thereof in this state, or shall extend or construct its road or any portion or branch thereof in this state, shall possess and may exercise and enjoy, as to the control, management and operation of the said road, and as to the location, construction and operation of any extension or branch thereof, all the rights, powers, privileges and franchises possessed by any railroad corporations organized under the laws of this state, including the exercise of the power of eminent domain. Such purchase, sale, consolidation with, or lease may be made or such aid furnished upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the directors or trustees of the respective companies; but the same shall be approved or ratified by persons holding or representing a majority in amount of the capital stock of each of such companies, respectively, at any annual stockholders’ meeting or at a special meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose, or by approval in writing of a majority in interest of the stockholders of each company respectively; provided, that nothing in the foregoing provisions shall be held or construed as curtailing the right of this state or of the counties through which any such road or roads may be located to levy and collect taxes upon the same and upon the rolling stock thereof in conformity with the provisions of the laws of this state upon that subject; and all roads and branches thereof in this state, so consolidated with, purchased or leased, or aided or extended into this state, shall be subject to taxation and to regulation and control by the laws of this state, in all respects the same as if constructed by corporations organized under the laws of this state; and any corporation of another state or territory, or of the United States, being the purchaser or lessee of a railroad within this state or extending its railroad or any portion thereof into or through this state, shall establish and maintain an office or offices in this state at some point or points on its line, at which legal process and notice may be served as upon railroad corporations of this state; provided, further, that before any railroad corporation organized under the laws of any other state or territory or of the United States shall be permitted to avail itself of the benefits of this act [section], such corporation shall file with the secretary of state a true copy of its charter or articles of incorporation. Any consolidation by sale or otherwise, or any lease or agreement to sell, consolidate with or lease the whole or any part of any railroad and its branch lines, organized under the laws of Wyoming with the franchises appertaining thereto, to any railroad company organized or existing under the laws of the United States or of Wyoming or any other state or territory, or any consolidation between such companies organized under the laws of the United States or of Wyoming or any other state or territory, and a corporation organized under the laws of Wyoming executed prior to February twenty-seventh, A.D. 1890, by the proper officers of the companies, parties to such sale, lease or consolidation or contract, is hereby legalized and made in all respects valid and binding from the date of its execution.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, § 3206; C.S. 1910, § 4199; C.S. 1920, § 5370; R.S. 1931, § 96-106; C.S. 1945, § 65-106; W.S. 1957, § 37-201.

Cross references. —

As to interchange and transfer of messages, service and other facilities, see §

37-3-113

.

As to rights-of-way over state lands, see §§

37-9-203

through

37-9-205

.

For constitutional provisions declaring right of railroads that cross or connect with other railroads and declaring right of railroads to interchange passengers, freight and other facilities, see art. 10, § 11, Wyo. Const.

As to excise tax on railroads transporting freight, see chapter 20 of title 39.